Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.425, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Disciplinary dismissals prohibited. (a) A pupil enrolled in deleted text begin the following is not subject to dismissals under this chapter:deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end a preschool or prekindergarten program, including deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a child participating innew text end early childhood family education, school readiness, school readiness plus, voluntary prekindergarten, Head Start, or other school-based preschool or prekindergarten programdeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin is not subject to dismissals under this chapter.new text end deleted text begin (2) kindergarten through grade 3. deleted text end (b) This deleted text begin provisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionnew text end does not apply to a dismissal from school for less than one school day, except as provided under chapter 125A and federal law for a student receiving special education services. (c) Notwithstanding this subdivision, expulsions and exclusions may be used only after resources outlined in subdivision 2 have been exhausted, and only in circumstances where there is an ongoing serious safety threat to the child or others.